New York, session 2025-2026, S2586.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 4-100 of the election law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. a. In creating, consolidating, dividing or altering any election 4 district, the board of elections shall determine the number of citizens 5 of voting age in the district who speak the same language other than 6 English at home using the most recent United States Census data. If 7 fifteen percent of the number of voting age citizens who speak the same 8 language other than English at home, the board of elections must provide 9 for at least one poll worker that speaks such language at polling places 10 in the district. 11 b. For any currently existing election district, the board of 12 elections shall determine the number of citizens of voting age who speak 13 the same language other than English at home using the most recent 14 United States Census data. If fifteen percent of the number of voting 15 age citizens who speak the same language other than English at home, the 16 board of elections must provide for at least one poll worker that speaks 17 such language at polling places in the district. 18 c. Upon voter request, the poll worker assigned to an election 19 district pursuant to paragraphs a and b of this subdivision, shall 20 provide translation services to the voter in the language that led to 21 their assignment to a given election district. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02721-03-6